Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska82-330
Cultural preservation; legislative intent.

The Legislature finds that the cultural climate of Nebraska is important to the state in many ways, including economically, politically, educationally, and socially. Further, the Legislature finds that federal funding for the arts and humanities has decreased dramatically and that there is no assurance of continuation of federal funding. In order to ensure there is a stable cultural climate in our state for future generations, the Nebraska Arts Council and the Nebraska Humanities Council have joined efforts to establish a financial partnership between the public and private sectors.

Laws 1998, LB 799, § 1.